Tennessee, session 114, SB0559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-31-106, is amended by adding
the following as new subsections:
(c) If the occupant does not sign a written rental agreement revision that the
owner has delivered to the occupant by hand delivery, first class mail, or electronic mail,
then the occupant's continued use of the storage space for not less than thirty (30) days
from the date of the revision constitutes an acceptance of the rental agreement with the
same effect as if it had been signed by the occupant.
(d)
(1) An occupant shall not use a self-service storage facility after the
owner has delivered a written notice by hand delivery, certified mail, or electronic
mail of the termination or nonrenewal of the occupant's rental agreement. Such
notice must provide the occupant with not less than fifteen (15) days after
delivery of the notice to remove all personal property from the self-service
storage facility.
(2) The rental agreement may contain a provision notifying the occupant
of the owner's right to dispose of personal property at the self-service storage
facility more than fifteen (15) days after the termination or nonrenewal of the
rental agreement.
SB0559
002340
- 1 -

(3) Before the occupant's removal of all personal property, the owner
may place reasonable restrictions on the occupant's use of the self-service
storage facility, including limiting or denying the occupant's access to the self-
service storage facility to remove the occupant's personal property outside of the
owner's office hours. The owner may dispose of any personal property
remaining in the self-service storage facility after the date provided in the written
notice pursuant to subdivision (d)(2).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to conduct occurring on and after that date.
- 2 - 002340